District of Columbia statutes.
29-501

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Professional Corporation Act of 2010”.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Cross References

Accountants, registration of firms of CPAs, compliance with this chapter, see § 47-2853.44.
Income and franchise taxes, “corporation” defined, see § 47-1801.04.
Income and franchise taxes, “unincorporated business” defined, see § 47-1801.01.

Editor's Notes

Former § 29-501 has been recodified as § 36-501.